src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! # Bokmål pronoun stems

!! This file documents the Bokmål pronouns stem file [stems/pronouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-nob/blob/main/src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc).

LEXICON Pronoun
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
Personal ;
Reflexive ;
Reciprocal ;
Interrogative ;
Possessive ;
Other_Pronouns ;

LEXICON Personal 
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
 jeg+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom:jeg # ;
 jeg+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Acc:meg # ;
  du+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom:du # ;
  du+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Acc:deg # ;
 han/hun+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom:han/hun # ;
 hen+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom:hen # ;
 han+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom:han # ;
 hun+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom:hun # ;
 hun+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom+Use/NG:ho # ;
 han+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc:han # ;
 han+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc:ham # ;
 han+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc+Err/Orth:honom # ;
 hun+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc:henne # ;
 han/hun+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc:han/henne # ;
 hen+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc:hen # ;
 den+Pron+Pers+Sg3:den # ; ! Gender? -- no, only as Det Dem (?)
 det+Pron+Pers+Sg3:det # ; ! Gender? -- no, only as Det Dem (?)
 den+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Poss:dens # ; ! Gender? -- no, only as Det Dem (?) # var Clt
 det+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Poss:dets # ; ! Gender? -- no, only as Det Dem (?) # var Clt
  vi+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Nom:vi # ;
  vi+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Acc:oss # ;
dere+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Nom:dere # ;
dere+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Acc:dere # ;
  de+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Nom:de # ;
  de+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc:dem # ;

LEXICON Reflexive 
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
seg+Pron+Refl+Acc:seg # ;

LEXICON Reciprocal
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
hverandre+Pron+Recipr+Acc:hverandre K ;

LEXICON Interrogative 
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
hva+Pron+Interr:hva # ;
hvem+Pron+Interr:hvem K ;

LEXICON Possessive 
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
din+Det+Poss+Fem+Sg2:di # ;
din+Det+Poss+Msc+Sg2:din # ;
din+Det+Poss+Pl2:dine # ;
din+Det+Poss+Neu+Sg2:ditt # ;
min+Det+Poss+Fem+Sg:mi # ;
min+Det+Poss+Msc+Sg:min # ;
min+Det+Poss+Pl:mine # ;
min+Det+Poss+Neu+Sg:mitt # ;
sin+Det+Poss+Fem+Sg3:si # ;
sin+Det+Poss+Msc+Sg3:sin # ;
sin+Det+Poss+Pl3:sine # ;
sin+Det+Poss+Neu+Sg3:sitt # ;
vår+Det+Poss+Sg1+Fem:vår # ;
vår+Det+Poss+Sg1+Msc:vår # ;
vår+Det+Poss+Pl1:våre # ;
vår+Det+Poss+Sg1+Neu:vårt # ;
hans+Det+Poss+Msc+Sg3:hans # ;
hennes+Det+Poss+Fem+Sg3:hennes # ;
hans/hennes+Det+Poss+Sg3:hans/hennes # ;
hens+Det+Poss+Sg3:hens # ;
deres+Det+Poss+Pl2:deres # ;
deres+Det+Poss+Pl3:deres # ;

LEXICON Other_Pronouns
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 

selveste+Det+Dem+Sg:selveste # ;
all+Det+Dem+Pl:alle K ;
all+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg:all # ;
all+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg:all # ;
all+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg:alt # ;
annen+Det+Dem+Pl:andre # ;
annen+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg:anna # ;
annen+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg:annen # ;
annen+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg:annen # ;
annen+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg:annet # ;
annen+Pron+Dem+Pl:andre # ;
annen+Pron+Dem+Pl+Clt:andre # ;
annen+Pron+Dem+Fem+Sg:anna # ;
annen+Pron+Dem+Fem+Sg:annen # ;
annen+Pron+Dem+Msc+Sg:annen # ;
annen+Pron+Dem+Neu+Sg:annet # ;
annenhver+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg:annenhver # ;
annenhver+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg:annenhver # ;
annenhver+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg:annethvert # ;
annenhver+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Err/Orth:annenhvert # ;
begge+Det+Qnt+Pl:begge # ;
begge+Pron+Qnt+Pl:begge # ;
begge+Det+Qnt+Pl+Clt:begges # ;
den+Det+Dem+Pl:de # ;
den+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg:den # ;
den+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg:den # ;
denne+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg:denne K ;
denne+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg:denne K ;
den+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg:det # ;
denne+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg:dette K ;
denne+Det+Dem+Pl:disse K ;
ei+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg:ei # ;
en+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg:en # ;
en+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg:en # ;
en+Pron+Indef+Msc+Sg:en # ;
en+Pron+Indef+Fem+Sg:en # ;
eneste+Det+Dem:eneste # ;
et+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg:et # ;
et+Pron+Indef+Neu+Sg:et # ;
ett+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg:ett # ;
flere+Det+Dem+Pl:flere # ;
flere+Pron+Indef+Pl:flere # ;
halvannen+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg:halvanna # ;
halvannen+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg:halvannen # ;
halvannen+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg:halvannen # ;
halvannen+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg:halvannet # ;
hver+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg:hver # ;
hver+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg:hver # ;
hver+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg:hvert # ;
hvilken+Det+Dem+Pl:hvilke # ;
hvilken+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg:hvilken # ;
hvilken+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg:hvilken # ;
hvilken+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg:hvilket # ;
hvis+Det+Poss+Qst:hvis # ;
ingen+Pron+Indef:ingen # ;
man+Pron+Indef:man # ;
mange+Det+Dem+Pl:mange # ;
noe+Det+Qnt+Neu+Sg:noe # ;
noe+Pron+Indef:noe # ;
noen+Det+Qnt+Pl:noen # ;
noen+Pron+Indef:noen # ;
samme+Det+Dem:samme # ;
selv+Det+Intens:selv # ;
selv+Det+Intens:selve # ;
selv+Pron+Intens:selv # ;
selv+Pron+Intens:selve # ;
sjøl+Det+Intens:sjøl # ;
sjøl+Pron+Intens:sjøl # ;
slik+Det+Dem+Pl:slike # ;
slik+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg:slik # ;
slik+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg:slik # ;
slik+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg:slikt # ;
sånn+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg:sånn # ;
sånn+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg:sånn # ;
sånn+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg:sånt # ;
sånn+Det+Dem+Sg+Pl:sånne # ;
én+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg:én # ;
én+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg:én # ;
